Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 2. Planning and Zoning Commission
§ 18-5-207.
Continuation of existing uses; effect of alteration or addition; future use after discontinuation of nonconforming use.

A zoning resolution enacted under the provisions of W.S.

18-5-201

through

18-5-206

shall not prohibit the continuance of the use of any land, building or structure for the purpose for which the land, building or structure is used at the time the resolution is adopted and it is not necessary to secure any certificate permitting such continuance. However, the alteration or addition to any existing building or structure for the purpose of effecting any change in use may be regulated or prohibited by zoning resolution. If a nonconforming use is discontinued any future use of such land, building or structure shall be in conformity with the provisions of the resolution regulating uses in the area in which the land, building or structure is located.

A county shall not enact a zoning resolution or take any other action that eliminates livestock grazing on any private land or land owned by the county without first complying with the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 85, § 9; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2019 ch. 165, § 1, effective February 28, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a); and added (b).

Laws 2019, ch. 165 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

Severability. —

Section 10, ch. 85, Laws 1959, reads: “If any provision in this act shall for any reason be invalid, it shall not affect the remainder of this act and this act shall remain in force and effect the same as if such part held invalid had not been included herein.”

Nonconforming gravel business. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-5-207

did not deny a county authority to regulate a landowner's
nonconforming gravel business by omitting “land” when
allowing regulation of changes to nonconforming uses because the statute
said nothing about change in land use. Seherr-Thoss v. Teton County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2014 WY 82, 329 P.3d 936,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2014).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-5-207

did not allow a county to reduce the size of a landowner's
nonconforming gravel operation because the landowner satisfied the
doctrine of diminishing assets by showing (1) the landowner actively
ran the business when land use regulations were adopted and objectively
showed an intent to expand the business then and (2) operating the
business had no substantially different and adverse impact on the
neighborhood. Seherr-Thoss v. Teton County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2014 WY 82, 329 P.3d 936,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2014).

Doctrine of diminishing assets. —

Doctrine of
diminishing assets was adopted to resolve an ambiguity in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-5-207

on use of the word “land” because the doctrine
provided an objective way to quantify “land.” Seherr-Thoss v. Teton County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2014 WY 82, 329 P.3d 936,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2014).

To define
the extent of a protected, nonconforming land use involving a diminishing
asset, a land owner must prove each prong of the doctrine of diminishing
assets, showing (1) excavation activities were actively pursued when
a zoning ordinance became effective, (2) the area to be excavated
was clearly intended to be excavated, as measured by objective manifestations,
and (3) the continued operations have no substantially different and
adverse impact on the neighborhood. Seherr-Thoss v. Teton County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2014 WY 82, 329 P.3d 936,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2014).

Construction. —

Second sentence
of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-5-207

creates a permissive exception to the grandfather exception
in the first sentence, and this permissive exception is limited to
certain uses of buildings and structures and not uses of land because
the sentence has no applicability to a change in use of land. Seherr-Thoss v. Teton County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2014 WY 82, 329 P.3d 936,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2014).

First sentence
of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-5-207

is ambiguous regarding the geographic extent of the word
“land” because the statute is silent as to whether one
may continue a pre-existing use of land throughout the whole parcel,
only on the portions of the parcel affected at the time the zoning
resolution was adopted, or to some area of land in between those alternatives. Seherr-Thoss v. Teton County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2014 WY 82, 329 P.3d 936,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2014).

Enactment of freeze resolution without notice or hearing, subject to condition. —

Section

18-5-201

gives counties either express or implied power to enact a freeze resolution, without notice and hearing, providing that such a freeze is only for a reasonable length of time. Snake River Venture v. Board of County Comm'rs, 616 P.2d 744,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1980).

Property owner lacks vested right in contemplated development. —

Property owner has no vested right, which will withstand a later zoning regulation, in a development which is merely contemplated. Snake River Venture v. Board of County Comm'rs, 616 P.2d 744,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1980).

Nonconforming certificate not required. —

Where landowner had established its intended commercial use in prior years, and where the ten month moratorium banning commercial use was invalid, corporation's commercial use was “grandfathered”, and commercial operations could continue without seeking a certificate permitting nonconforming use. Crouthamel v. Board of Albany County Comm'rs, 951 P.2d 835,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1998).

Construction. —

This section forbids counties from enacting zoning regulations that prohibit existing uses. Snake River Brewing Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2002 WY 11, 39 P.3d 397,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

River Springs Ltd. Liab. Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 899 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Classification and maintenance of advertising structure as nonconforming use, 80 ALR3d 630.

Building in course of construction as establishing valid nonconforming use or vested right to complete construction for intended use, 89 ALR3d 1051.

Construction and application of zoning regulations in connection with funeral homes, 92 ALR3d 328.

Validity of zoning ordinances prohibiting or regulating outside storage of house trailers, motor homes, campers, vans and the like, in residential neighborhoods, 95 ALR3d 378.

Enforcement of zoning regulation as affected by other violations, 4 ALR4th 462.

Zoning: occupation of less than all dwelling units as discontinuance or abandonment of multifamily dwelling nonconforming use, 40 ALR4th 1012.

Change in area or location of nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 56 ALR4th 769.

Alteration, extension, reconstruction or repair of nonconforming structure or structure devoted to nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 63 ALR4th 275.

Validity of provisions for amortization of nonconforming uses, 8 ALR5th 391.

Activities in preparation for building as establishing valid nonconforming use or vested right to engage in construction for intended use, 38 ALR5th 737.

§ 18-5-208.
Special expertise of board of county commissioners and coordination of planning efforts with federal agencies.

When representing a county as a cooperating agency in matters related to the National Environmental Policy Act and in federal land planning, implementation and management actions, a board of county commissioners shall be deemed to have special expertise on all subject matters for which it has statutory responsibility, including but not limited to, all subject matters directly or indirectly related to the health, safety, welfare, custom, culture and socio-economic viability of a county.

The board of county commissioners of a county which has officially adopted a comprehensive plan pursuant to W.S. 18-5-202(b) may participate in efforts to coordinate the plan with federal agencies as provided in the Federal Land Policy and Management Act of 1976, the Forest and Rangeland Renewable Resources Planning Act of 1974, as amended by the National Forest Management Act of 1976 and any other federal statute which provides for coordination with local governments and federal regulations adopted pursuant to those acts.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 104, § 1; 2012, ch. 13, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

added (a); added (b) designator; and in (b), substituted “agencies” for “regional forest or other resource management plans,” inserted “the Forest and Rangeland Renewable Resources Planning Act of 1974, as amended by the National Forest Management Act of 1976 and any other federal statute which provides for coordination with local governments,” and substituted “those acts” for “that act, including, but not limited to, Title 36, of the Code of Federal Regulations, part 219.7 and Title 43, of the Code of Federal Regulations, part 1610.3” at the end.

Laws 2012, ch. 13 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.

Federal Land Policy and Management Act. —

The Federal Land Policy and Management Act of 1976, referred to in this section, appears throughout titles 7, 16, 30, 40, and 43 of the United States Code.